Utah statutes.
53B-15-103.   Proceedings -- Notice -- Inspection of records -- Repayment -- Hearing.

When a state college, university, or board determines that a public employee is indebted to the state for debts arising from a defaulted student loan, it may initiate proceedings to collect the debt through deductions from earnings by providing the public employee with the following:

(1)  a minimum of 30 days' written notice as provided in Section 53B-14-102;

(2)  an opportunity to inspect and copy college, university, or board records relating to the debt;

(3)  an opportunity to enter into a written agreement with the college, university, or board, under terms agreeable to the college, university, or board, to establish a schedule for the repayment of the debt; and

(4)  an opportunity for a hearing on the determination of the college, university, or board concerning the existence or the amount of the debt in accordance with Sections 53B-14-104 and 53B-14-105 and judicial review of an order of a hearing examiner under Sections 53B-14-107 and 53B-14-108.

